Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.380

Court assistance in taking evidence—Consolidation.

(1) The arbitral tribunal or a party with the approval of the arbitral tribunal may request from the superior court assistance in taking evidence. The court may execute the request within its competence and according to its rules on taking evidence.

(2) When the parties to two or more arbitration agreements have agreed in their respective arbitration agreements or otherwise, the superior court may, on application by one party with the consent of all other parties to those arbitration agreements, do one or more of the following:

(a) Order the arbitration proceedings arising out of those arbitration agreements to be consolidated on terms the court considers just and necessary;

(b) Where all parties cannot agree on an arbitral tribunal for the consolidated arbitration, appoint an arbitral tribunal in accordance with RCW 7.05.120(4); and

(c) Where the parties cannot agree on any other matter necessary to conduct the consolidated arbitration, make any other order it considers necessary.

[ 2015 c 276 s 38.]